Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2124
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the responsibilities of the Department of Transportation, of the counties, and of the municipalities in their planning programs as authorized by state law and by home rule charter and to encourage the acceptance and implementation of comprehensive, continuing, cooperative, and coordinated planning by the state, the counties, and the municipalities. Sections 13-914 and 39-2101 to 39-2125 are not intended to prohibit or inhibit the actions of the counties and of the municipalities in their planning programs and their subdivision regulations, nor are sections 13-914 and 39-2101 to 39-2125 intended to restrict the actions of the municipalities in their creation of street improvement districts and in their assessment of property for special benefits as authorized by state law or by home rule charter.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 24, p. 1128;

Laws 1971, LB 100, § 13;

Laws 1983, LB 10, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB277, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 158.